Mississippi, session 2026, HB1369.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 73-35-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-35-17.  (1)  A fee not to exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) shall accompany an application for a real estate broker's license, and in the event that the applicant successfully passes the examination, no additional fee shall be required for the issuance of a license for a one-year period; provided, that if an applicant fails to pass the examination, he may be eligible to take the next or succeeding examination without the payment of an additional fee.  In the event a contract testing service is utilized, the fee associated with administering the test shall be collected by the testing provider and the application fee for any real estate license shall be collected by the commission. (2)  For each license as a real estate broker issued to a member of a partnership, association or officer of a corporation other than the member or officer named in the license issued to such partnership, association or corporation, a fee not to exceed Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00) shall be charged. (3)  A fee not to exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) shall accompany an application for a real estate salesperson's license, and in the event that the applicant successfully passes the examination, no additional fee shall be required for the issuance of a license for a one-year period; provided, that if an applicant fails to pass the examination, he may be eligible to take the next or succeeding examination without the payment of an additional fee.  In the event a contract testing service is utilized, the fee associated with administering the test shall be collected by the testing provider and the application fee for any real estate license shall be collected by the commission. (4)  Except as provided in Section 33-1-39, it shall be the duty of all persons, partnerships, associations, companies or corporations licensed to practice as a real estate broker or salesperson to register with the commission annually or biennially, in the discretion of the commission, according to rules promulgated by it and to pay the proper registration fee.  An application for renewal of license shall be made to the commission annually no later than December 31 of each year, or biennially on a date set by the commission.  A licensee failing to pay his renewal fee after the same becomes due and after two (2) months' written notice of his delinquency mailed to him by United States certified mail addressed to his address of record with the commission shall thereby have his license automatically cancelled.  Any licensee renewing in this grace period shall pay a penalty in the amount of * * *one hundred percent (100%) fifty percent (50%) of the renewal fee.  The renewal fee shall not exceed Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00) per year for real estate brokers, partnerships, associations and corporations.  The renewal fee for a real estate salesperson's license shall not exceed Sixty Dollars ($60.00) per year. (5)  For each additional office or place of business, an annual fee not to exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00) shall be charged. (6)  For each change of office or place of business, a fee not to exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00) shall be charged. (7)  For each duplicate or transfer of salesperson's license, a fee not to exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00) shall be charged. (8)  For each duplicate license, where the original license is lost or destroyed, and affidavit made thereof, a fee not to exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00) shall be charged. (9)  To change status as a licensee from active to inactive status, a fee not to exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) shall be charged.  To change status as a licensee from inactive to active status, a fee not to exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00) shall be charged. (10)  For each bad check received by the commission, a fee not to exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) shall be charged. (11)  A fee not to exceed Five Dollars ($5.00) per hour of instruction may be charged to allay costs of seminars for educational purposes provided by the commission. (12)  A fee not to exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) may be charged for furnishing any person a copy of a real estate license, a notarized certificate of licensure or other official record of the commission. (13)  A fee not to exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) shall be charged to review and process the application and instructional materials for each curriculum seeking acceptance as a real estate continuing education course developed to satisfy the mandatory continuing education requirements for this chapter, with the period of approval expiring after one (1) year.  A fee not to exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00) shall be charged for each renewal of a previously approved course, with the period of renewal expiring after one (1) year. (14)  Fees, up to the limits specified herein, shall be established by the Mississippi Real Estate Commission. SECTION 2.  Section 73-35-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 73-35-7.  Licenses shall be granted only to persons who present, and to corporations, partnerships, companies or associations whose officers, associates or partners present satisfactory proof to the commission that they are trustworthy and competent to transact the business of a real estate broker or real estate salesperson in such manner as to safeguard the interests of the public.  Except as otherwise provided in this section, every person who applies for a resident license as a real estate broker:  (a) shall be age twenty-one (21) years or over, and have his legal domicile in the State of Mississippi at the time he applies; (b) shall be subject to the jurisdiction of this state, subject to the income tax laws and other excise laws thereof, subject to the road and bridge privilege tax laws thereof; (c) shall not be an elector in any other state; (d) shall have held a license as an active real estate salesperson for twelve (12) months prior to making application for the broker's examination hereafter specified; (e) shall have successfully completed a minimum of one hundred twenty (120) hours of courses in real estate as hereafter specified; (f) shall have successfully completed the real estate broker's examination as hereafter specified; and (g) shall have successfully been cleared for licensure by the commission's background investigation as provided in Section 73-35-10; and (h) sign a form under penalty of perjury stating that the applicant will not hire any real estate salespersons for thirty-six (36) months from the date of approval of his or her active real estate salesperson's license.  The real estate commission shall create a standard form to comply with the requirements of this section.  Upon completion of such restriction provided in this paragraph (h) of this section, the real estate broker is authorized to employ any number of real estate salespersons. The provisions of paragraph (h) shall not apply to an applicant who seeks to hire a real estate salesperson in less than thirty-six (36) months from the date of approval of his or her active real estate salesperson's license.  Any person who desires to hire a real estate salesperson in less than thirty-six (36) months from the date of approval of his or her active real estate salesperson's license shall:  (a) be age twenty-one (21) years or over, and have his or her legal domicile in the State of Mississippi at the time he or she applies; (b) be subject to the jurisdiction of this state, subject to the income tax laws and other excise laws thereof, subject to the road and bridge privilege tax laws thereof; (c) not be an elector in any other state; (d) have held a license as an active real estate salesperson for thirty-six (36) months prior to making application for the broker's examination hereafter specified; (e) have successfully completed a minimum of one hundred twenty (120) hours of courses in real estate as hereafter specified; (f) have successfully completed the real estate broker's examination as hereafter specified; and (g) have successfully been cleared for licensure by the commission's background investigation as provided in Section 73-35-10. An applicant who has not held an active real estate salesperson's license for a period of at least thirty-six (36) months prior to submitting an application shall have successfully completed a minimum of one hundred fifty (150) classroom hours in real estate courses, which courses are acceptable for credit toward a degree at a college or university as approved by the Southern Association of Colleges and Schools. Every applicant for a resident license as a real estate salesperson shall be age eighteen (18) years or over, shall be a bona fide resident of the State of Mississippi prior to filing his application, shall have successfully completed a minimum of sixty (60) hours in courses in real estate as hereafter specified, and shall have successfully completed the real estate salesperson's examination as hereafter specified. The residency requirements set forth in this section shall not apply to those licensees of other states who qualify and obtain nonresident licenses in this state. The commission is authorized to exempt from such prelicensing educational requirements, in whole or in part, a real estate licensee of another state who desires to obtain a license under this chapter, provided that the prelicensing educational requirements in the other state are determined by the commission to be equivalent to prelicensing educational requirements in this state and provided that such state extends this same privilege or exemption to Mississippi real estate licensees.  The issuance of a license by reciprocity to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. SECTION 3.  Section 73-35-18, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 73-35-18.  (1)  Each individual applicant for renewal of a license issued by the Mississippi Real Estate Commission shall, on or before the expiration date of his license, or at a time directed by the commission, submit proof of completion of not less than sixteen (16) clock hours of approved course work to the commission, in addition to any other requirements for renewal.  The sixteen (16) clock hours' course work requirement shall apply to each two-year license renewal, and hours in excess thereof shall not be cumulated or credited for the purposes of subsequent license renewals except as provided in this subsection (1).  The commission shall develop standards for approval of courses and shall require certification of such course work of the applicant.  The commission may determine any required subject matter within the mandated sixteen (16) hours; provided that the required subjects shall not exceed eight (8) hours of the total sixteen (16) hours.  Approved continuing education hours earned in the final three (3) months of a licensee's renewal period, if in excess of the required minimum sixteen (16) hours, may be carried over and credited to the next renewal period.  However, no more than six (6) hours may be carried over in this manner.  Any member of the Mississippi Legislature who has a real estate license shall be credited with eight (8) hours of credit for the attendance of each year of a legislative session.  No person may receive continuing education credit for prelicense education courses taken, except as follows:  a licensee whose license is on inactive status and whose continuing education credits are at least thirty (30) hours in arrears may, at the discretion of the commission, receive continuing education credit for retaking prelicense coursework, provided the entire prelicense course is retaken. (2)  This section shall apply to renewals of licenses which expire on and after July 1, 1994; however, an applicant for first renewal who has been licensed for not more than one (1) year shall not be required to comply with this section for the first renewal of the applicant's license.  The provisions of this section shall not apply to persons who have held a broker's or salesperson's license in this state for at least twenty-five (25) years and who are at least sixty-five (65) years of age.  Inactive licensees are not required to meet the real estate continuing education requirements specified in this section; however, such inactive licensees, before activating their license to active status, must cumulatively meet requirements missed during the period their license was inactive. (3)  A renewal of a license issued by the commission which expires after June 30, 2019, must include a current email address for the applicant.  Any email address previously provided by an applicant to the commission which is no longer valid or the primary email address of the applicant must be updated when a renewal application is submitted under this section. (4)  The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to accomplish the purposes of this section in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law. (5)  [Repealed] SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.